California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 15.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide adequate instrumentation throughout California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.

(a) A city, county, and city and county shall collect a fee from each applicant for a building permit. Each fee shall be equal to a specific amount of the proposed building construction for which the building permit is issued as determined by the local building officials. The fee amount shall be assessed in the following way:

(1) Group R occupancies, as defined in the California Building Code (Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), one to three stories in height, except hotels and motels, shall be assessed at the rate of thirteen dollars ($13) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), with appropriate fractions thereof.

(2) All other
 buildings shall be assessed at the rate of twenty-eight dollars ($28) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), with appropriate fractions thereof.

(3) The fee shall be the amount assessed under paragraph (1) or (2), depending on building type, or fifty cents ($0.50), whichever is the higher.

(b) (1) In lieu of the requirements of subdivision (a), a city, county, and city and county may elect to include a rate of thirteen dollars ($13) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), with appropriate fractions thereof, in its basic building permit fee for any Group R occupancy defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and a rate of twenty-eight dollars ($28) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), with appropriate fractions thereof, for all other building types. A city, county, and city and county electing to collect the fee pursuant to this
 subdivision need not segregate the fees in a fund separate from any fund into which basic building permit fees are deposited.

(2) “Building,” for the purpose of this chapter, is any structure built for the support, shelter, or enclosure of persons, animals, chattels, or property of any kind.

(c) (1) A city, county, and city and county may retain up to 5 percent of the total amount it collects under subdivision (a) or (b) for data utilization, for seismic education incorporating data interpretations from data of the strong-motion instrumentation program and the seismic hazards mapping program, and, in accordance with paragraph (2), for improving the preparation for damage assessment after strong seismic motion events.

(2) A city, county, and city and county may use any funds retained pursuant to
 this subdivision to improve the preparation for damage assessment in its jurisdiction only after it provides the Department of Conservation with information indicating to the department that data utilization and seismic education activities have been adequately funded.

(d) Funds collected pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), less the amount retained pursuant to subdivision (c), shall be deposited in the Strong-Motion Instrumentation and Seismic Hazards Mapping Fund, as created by Section 2699.5 to be used exclusively for purposes of this chapter, Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621), and Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 2690).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 129.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.5.

The California Geological Survey shall advise counties and cities as to that portion of the total fees allocated to the Strong-Motion Instrumentation and Seismic Hazards Mapping Fund, so that this information may be provided to building permit applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.

The survey, upon the advice of the Seismic Safety Commission, whenever it determines that an adequate instrumentation program has been achieved, may reduce the fee levied against building permits as provided in Section 2705 to a level sufficient to maintain the program established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 27.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2709.

Any city or county that has been exempted from the provisions of Section 2705 by Section 2708 may participate in the state strong-motion instrumentation program by a written request to the State Geologist by the governing body of such city or county that its exemption be rescinded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

2709.1.

(a) No strong-motion instrumentation shall be installed pursuant to this chapter in the structural types identified in subdivision (b) unless funds proportionate to the construction value as called for under Section 2705 are received from organizations or entities representing these structural types, or the instrumentation is specifically called for by the Seismic Safety Commission in urgency situations.

(b) The structural types subject to this section include all of the following:

(1) Hospitals.

(2) Dams.

(3) Bridges.

(4) Schools.

(5) Powerplants.

(c) The Strong-Motion Instrumentation and Seismic Hazards Mapping Fund may accept funds from sources other than the permit fees identified in this chapter. The priority of installations performed under this chapter shall be determined by the Seismic Safety Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 9.   Effective August 13, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 240.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 [2710. - 2796.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2710. - 2719.]

2710.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2711.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the extraction of minerals is essential to the continued economic well-being of the state and to the needs of the society, and that the reclamation of mined lands is necessary to prevent or minimize adverse effects on the environment and to protect the public health and safety.

(b) The Legislature further finds that the reclamation of mined lands as provided in this chapter will permit the continued mining of minerals and will provide for the protection and subsequent beneficial use of the mined and reclaimed land.

(c) The Legislature further finds that surface mining
 takes place in diverse areas where the geologic, topographic, climatic, biological, and social conditions are significantly different and that reclamation operations and the specifications therefor may vary accordingly.

(d) The Legislature further finds that the production and development of local mineral resources that help maintain a strong economy and that are necessary to build the state’s infrastructure are vital to reducing transportation emissions that result from the distribution of hundreds of millions of tons of construction aggregates that are used annually in building and maintaining the state.

(e) The Legislature further finds and recognizes the need of the state to provide local governments, metropolitan planning organizations, and other relevant planning
 agencies with the information necessary to identify and protect mineral resources within general plans.

(f) The Legislature further finds that the state’s mineral resources are vital, finite, and important natural resources and the responsible protection and development of these mineral resources is vital to a sustainable California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (AB 566)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2712.

It is the intent of the Legislature to create and maintain an effective and comprehensive surface mining and reclamation policy with regulation of surface mining operations so as to assure that:

(a) Adverse environmental effects are prevented or minimized and that mined lands are reclaimed to a usable condition which is readily adaptable for alternative land uses.

(b) The production and conservation of minerals are encouraged, while giving consideration to values relating to recreation, watershed, wildlife, range and forage, and aesthetic enjoyment.

(c) Residual hazards to the public health and safety are eliminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2713.

It is not the intent of the Legislature by the enactment of this chapter to take private property for public use without payment of just compensation in violation of the California and United States Constitutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2714.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following activities:

(a) Excavations or grading of lands conducted for farming.

(b) Onsite excavation and onsite earthmoving activities that are integral and necessary for the construction of structures and that are undertaken to prepare a site for the construction of those structures, including landscaping or other land improvements associated with those structures, including the related excavation, grading, compaction, or the creation of fills, road cuts, and embankments, whether or not surplus materials are exported from the site, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) All required permits for the
 construction and any associated landscaping or related land improvements have been approved by a public agency in accordance with applicable provisions of state law and locally adopted plans and ordinances, including, but not limited to, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(2) The lead agency’s approval of the construction project included consideration of the onsite excavation and onsite earthmoving activities pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(3) The approved construction project is consistent with the general plan or zoning of the site.

(4) Surplus materials shall not be exported from the site unless and until actual construction work has commenced and shall cease if it is determined that
 construction activities have terminated, have been indefinitely suspended, or are no longer being actively pursued.

(c) Operation of a plant site used for mineral processing, including associated onsite structures, equipment, machines, tools, or other materials, including the onsite stockpiling and onsite recovery of mined materials, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The plant site is located on lands designated for industrial or commercial uses in the applicable county or city general plan.

(2) The plant site is located on lands zoned as industrial or commercial or are contained within a zoning category intended exclusively for industrial activities by the applicable city or county.

(3) None of the minerals being processed are being
 extracted onsite.

(4) All reclamation work has been completed pursuant to the approved reclamation plan for any mineral extraction activities that occurred onsite after January 1, 1976.

(d) Prospecting for or the extraction of minerals for commercial purposes where the removal of overburden or mineral product totals less than 1,000 cubic yards in any one location and the total surface area disturbed is less than one acre.

(e) Surface mining operations that are required by federal law in order to protect a mining claim, if those operations are conducted solely for that purpose.

(f) Any other surface mining operations that the board determines to be of an infrequent nature and that involve only minor surface disturbances.

(g) The solar evaporation of seawater or bay water for the production of salt and related minerals.

(h) Emergency excavations or grading conducted by the Department of Water Resources or the Central Valley Flood Protection Board for the purpose of averting, alleviating, repairing, or restoring damage to property due to imminent or recent floods, disasters, or other emergencies.

(i) (1) Surface mining operations conducted on lands owned or leased, or upon which easements or rights-of-way have been obtained, by the Department of Water Resources for the purpose of the State Water Resources Development System or flood control, and surface mining operations on lands owned or leased, or upon which easements or rights-of-way have been obtained, by the Central Valley Flood Protection Board for the purpose
 of flood control, if the Department of Water Resources adopts, after submission to and consultation with, the Division of Mine Reclamation, a reclamation plan for lands affected by these activities, and those lands are reclaimed in conformance with the standards specified in regulations of the board adopted pursuant to this chapter. The Department of Water Resources shall provide an annual report to the department by the date specified by the department on these surface mining operations.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall require the Department of Water Resources or the Central Valley Flood Protection Board to obtain a permit or secure approval of a reclamation plan from any city or county in order to conduct surface mining operations specified in paragraph (1). Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the bringing of an enforcement action pursuant to Section 2774.1, if it is determined that an operator, acting under contract with the
 Department of Water Resources or the Central Valley Flood Protection Board on lands other than those owned or leased, or upon which easements or rights-of-way have been obtained, by the Department of Water Resources or the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, is otherwise not in compliance with this chapter.

(j) Emergency excavations or grading conducted by the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California for its own operations and infrastructure for the purpose of averting, alleviating, repairing, or restoring damage to property due to imminent or recent floods, disasters, or other emergencies. 

(k) (1) Excavations or grading for the exclusive purpose of obtaining materials for roadbed construction and maintenance conducted in connection with timber operations or forest management on land owned by the same person or entity.
 This exemption is limited to excavation and grading that is conducted adjacent to timber operation or forest management roads and shall not apply to onsite excavation or grading that occurs within 100 feet of a Class One watercourse or 75 feet of a Class Two watercourse, or to excavation for materials that are, or have been, sold for commercial purposes.

(2) This exemption shall be available only if slope stability and erosion are controlled in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 3704 and subdivision (d) of Section 3706 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations and, upon closure of the site, the person closing the site implements, where necessary, revegetation measures and postclosure uses in consultation with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

 (l) Excavations, grading, or other earthmoving activities in an oil or gas field that are integral to
 and necessary for ongoing operations for the extraction of oil or gas that comply with all of the following conditions:

(1) The operations are being conducted in accordance with Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000).

(2) The operations are consistent with any general plan or zoning applicable to the site.

(3) The earthmoving activities are within oil or gas field properties under a common owner or operator.

(4) No excavated materials are sold for commercial purposes.

(m) (1) The immediate excavation or grading of lands affected by a natural disaster for the purpose of restoring those lands to their prior condition.

(2) The immediate removal of material deposited by a flood onto lands being farmed for the purpose of restoring those lands to their prior condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   (AB 442)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2715.

No provision of this chapter or any ruling, requirement, or policy of the board is a limitation on any of the following:

(a) On the police power of any city or county or on the power of any city or county to declare, prohibit, and abate nuisances.

(b) On the power of the Attorney General, at the request of the board, or upon his own motion, to bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enjoin any pollution or nuisance.

(c) On the power of any state agency in the enforcement or administration of any provision of law which it is specifically authorized or required to enforce or administer.

(d) On the right of any person to maintain at any time any appropriate action for relief against any private nuisance as defined in Part 3 (commencing with Section 3479) of Division 4 of the Civil Code or for any other private relief.

(e) On the power of any lead agency to adopt policies, standards, or regulations imposing additional requirements on any person if the requirements do not prevent the person from complying with the provisions of this chapter.

(f) On the power of any city or county to regulate the use of buildings, structures, and land as between industry, business, residences, open space (including agriculture, recreation, the enjoyment of scenic beauty, and the use of natural resources), and other purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 800, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2715.5.

(a) The Cache Creek Resource Management Plan, in conjunction with a site specific plan deemed consistent by the lead agency with the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan, shall be considered to be a functional equivalent of a reclamation plan for the purposes of this chapter. No other reclamation plan shall be required to be reviewed and approved for any excavation project subject to the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan that is conducted in conformance with an approved site specific plan that is consistent with the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan and the standards specified in that plan governing erosion control, channel stabilization, habitat restoration, flood control, or infrastructure maintenance, if that plan is reviewed and
 approved by a lead agency pursuant to this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the board of supervisors of the county in which the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan is to be implemented shall prepare and file an annual report required to be prepared pursuant to Section 2207, indicating the quantity of minerals produced. The board of supervisors of the county in which the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan is to be implemented shall be exempt from the payment of annual reporting fees imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 2207. An operator, acting under the authority of the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan, shall include in the operator’s annual report required pursuant to Section 2207 the quantity of materials produced and shall be responsible for payment of annual fees associated with the
 quantity of minerals produced.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes an enforcement action by the board or the Division of Mine Reclamation brought pursuant to this chapter or Section 2207 if the lead agency or the supervisor determines that an operator, acting under the authority of the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan, is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter or Section 2207.

(d) For purposes of this section, “site specific plan” means an individual project plan approved by the lead agency that is consistent with the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan. Site specific plans prepared in conformance with the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan shall include, at a minimum, the information required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2772, shall comply
 with the requirements of Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall be provided along with a financial assurance cost estimate to the Division of Mine Reclamation for review and comment pursuant to Section 2772.1 or 2773.4, as applicable. Notwithstanding the number of days authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 2772.1 or subdivision (c) of Section 2773.4, the Division of Mine Reclamation shall review the site specific plan and the financial assurance cost estimate and prepare any written comments within 15 days from the date of receipt of the plan and the estimate.

(e) Prior to engaging in an excavation activity in conformance with the Cache Creek Resource Management Plan, a surface mining operation shall be required to obtain financial
 assurances that meet the requirements of Section 2773.1. Release of financial assurances shall comply with Section 2773.1 and the provisions of Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 29.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2715.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Metropolitan Water District” means the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California.

(2) “Metropolitan Reclamation Plan” means a master reclamation plan that may be approved pursuant to this section for all surface mining operations conducted by the Metropolitan Water District within the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura. The master reclamation plan shall identify each individual surface mining operation and satisfy all reclamation plan requirements for each individual surface mining site.

(b) Unless otherwise provided in this section, the requirements of this chapter, Section 2207, and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall apply to surface mining operations conducted by the Metropolitan Water District within the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura.

(c) The board shall act as the lead agency pursuant to this chapter and Section 2207 for surface mining operations conducted by the Metropolitan Water District.

(d) In addition to any other requirements in statute or regulation, the Metropolitan Reclamation Plan shall include both of the following:

(1) A map that identifies the location of each individual surface mining operation conducted on lands Metropolitan Water District owns or leases, or upon which easements or rights-of-way have been granted to the Metropolitan Water District.

(2) Maintenance measures that become effective when any individual surface mining operation is idle or the site has no mineral production. Maintenance measures shall maintain the site in compliance with this chapter while the surface mining operation is idle or the site has no mineral production.

(e) The Metropolitan Reclamation Plan is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 2770, except that financial assurances required by Section 2773.1 shall remain in effect during any idle period.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2774, the board may conduct an inspection of an individual surface mining operation once every two calendar years during a period when that individual surface mining operation is idle or the site has no mineral production.

(g) (1) In the annual report required pursuant to Section 2207, the Metropolitan Water District shall provide a separate subreport for each individual surface mining operation that provides the information and documentation required in that section.

(2) The Metropolitan Water District shall pay an annual reporting fee pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2207.

(3) The
 board, in its role as the lead agency, may collect reasonable inspection costs pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2774 and, excluding Section 3696.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, may impose an administration fee pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2207 in an amount not to exceed the board’s reasonable costs in carrying out this chapter.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the Metropolitan Water District shall not be required to secure approval of a reclamation plan from any city or county or obtain a use permit from any city or county under this chapter to conduct the operations under the approved Metropolitan Reclamation Plan.

(i) The Metropolitan Water District shall not sell or allow any materials
 produced by its surface mining operations from lands it owns, leases, or upon which easements or rights-of-way have been granted to be sold or used for the benefit of any other person.

(j) For purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), the Metropolitan Water District shall be the lead agency for any environmental review of the Metropolitan Reclamation Plan.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2041, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 270, Sec. 1.   (AB 580)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2041, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2716.

(a) Any interested person may commence an action on his or her own behalf against the board, the lead agency, the State Geologist, the supervisor, or the director for a writ of mandate pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to compel the board, the State Geologist, the supervisor, or the director to carry out any duty imposed upon them pursuant to this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section, “person” means an individual, firm, association, corporation, organization, or partnership, or a city, county, district, or the state or any department or agency of the
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 30.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the board shall submit to the Legislature on December 1 of each year a report on the actions taken pursuant to this chapter during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a statement of the actions, including legislative recommendations, that are necessary to carry out more completely the purposes and requirements of this chapter.

(b) For purposes of ensuring compliance with Sections 10295.5 and 20676 of the Public Contract Code, the Division of Mine Reclamation shall, at a minimum, quarterly publish in the California Regulatory Notice Register, or otherwise make available upon request to the Department of General Services or any other state or local agency, a list identifying all surface mining
 operations subject to this chapter and Section 2207 that are reporting as newly permitted, active, or idle, for which all of the following apply:

(1) A reclamation plan has been approved.

(2) A financial assurance mechanism that is at least equal to the current approved financial assurance cost estimate, as described in Section 2736, has been approved.

(3) A financial assurance cost estimate required under Section 2773.4 has been submitted, as indicated on a notice of completion of inspection submitted by the lead agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2774. Operators may also confirm submission of their annual financial assurance cost estimate as required by subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 2773.4 by providing a copy of the first page of the financial assurance cost
 estimate (FACE-1) form to the supervisor.

(4) The annual report required under Section 2207 has been submitted.

(5) All fees required under Section 2207, including all past-due fees, administrative penalties, and interest have been paid.

(6) The operation is not out of compliance with an order to comply or stipulated order to comply.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), surface mining operations for which an appeal is pending before the board pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2770, if the appeal was not pending before the board for more than 180 days, shall be included on the list published pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) A report submitted pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 214.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2718.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2719.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither the state nor any county, city, district, or other political subdivision shall be exempt from any fee imposed upon a mining operation pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2207.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1066, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [2725. - 2736.]

2725.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2726.

“Area of regional significance” means an area designated by the board pursuant to Section 2790 which is known to contain a deposit of minerals, the extraction of which is judged to be of prime importance in meeting future needs for minerals in a particular region of the state within which the minerals are located and which, if prematurely developed for alternate incompatible land uses, could result in the permanent loss of minerals that are of more than local significance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2727.

“Area of statewide significance” means an area designated by the board pursuant to Section 2790 which is known to contain a deposit of minerals, the extraction of which is judged to be of prime importance in meeting future needs for minerals in the state and which, if prematurely developed for alternate incompatible land uses, could result in the permanent loss of minerals that are of more than local or regional significance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2727.1.

“Idle” means that an operator of a surface mining operation has curtailed production at the surface mining operation, with the intent to resume the surface mining operation at a future date, for a period of one year or more by more than 90 percent of its maximum annual mineral production within any of the last five years during which an interim management plan has not been approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.   (SB 108)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2728.

“Lead agency” means the city, county, San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, or the board which has the principal responsibility for approving a reclamation plan pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2729.

“Mined lands” includes the surface, subsurface, and ground water of an area in which surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted, including private ways and roads appurtenant to any such area, land excavations, workings, mining waste, and areas in which structures, facilities, equipment, machines, tools, or other materials or property which result from, or are used in, surface mining operations are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2730.

“Mining waste” includes the residual of soil, rock, mineral, liquid, vegetation, equipment, machines, tools, or other materials or property directly resulting from, or displaced by, surface mining operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2731.

“Operator” means any person who is engaged in surface mining operations, himself, or who contracts with others to conduct operations on his behalf, except a person who is engaged in surface mining operations as an employee with wages as his sole compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2732.

“Overburden” means soil, rock, or other materials that lie above a natural mineral deposit or in between mineral deposits, before or after their removal by surface mining operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2732.5.

“Permit” means any authorization from, or approval by, a lead agency, the absence of which would preclude surface mining operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2733.

“Reclamation” means the combined process of land treatment that minimizes water degradation, air pollution, damage to aquatic or wildlife habitat, flooding, erosion, and other adverse effects from surface mining operations, including adverse surface effects incidental to underground mines, so that mined lands are reclaimed to a usable condition that is readily adaptable for alternate land uses and create no danger to public health or safety. The process may extend to affected lands surrounding mined lands, and may require backfilling, grading, resoiling, revegetation, soil compaction, slope stabilization, or other measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 7, Sec. 3.   (AB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2734.

“State policy” means the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 2755.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 800, Sec. 2.2.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2735.

“Surface mining operations” means all, or any part of, the process involved in the mining of minerals on mined lands by removing overburden and mining directly from the mineral deposits, open-pit mining of minerals naturally exposed, mining by the auger method, dredging and quarrying, or surface work incident to an underground mine. Surface mining operations shall include, but are not limited to:

(a) Inplace distillation or retorting or leaching.

(b) The production and disposal of mining waste.

(c) Prospecting and exploratory activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2736.

“Financial assurances” means a current approved financial assurance cost estimate and a financial assurance mechanism that is at least equal to the current approved financial assurance cost estimate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 7, Sec. 4.   (AB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. District Committees [2740. - 2741.]

2740.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the board may establish districts and appoint one or more district technical advisory committees to advise the board. In establishing districts for these committees, the board shall take into account physical characteristics, including, but not limited to, climate, topography, geology, type of overburden, and principal mineral commodities. Members of the committees shall be selected and appointed on the basis of their professional qualifications and training in mineral resource conservation, development and utilization, land use planning, mineral economics, or the reclamation of mined lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2741.

The members of the committee shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State Policy for the Reclamation of Mined Lands [2755. - 2764.]

2755.

The board shall adopt regulations that establish state policy for the reclamation of mined lands in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 2710) of this chapter and pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 285.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2756.

State policy shall apply to the conduct of surface mining operations and shall include, but shall not be limited to, measures to be employed by lead agencies in specifying grading, backfilling, resoiling, revegetation, soil compaction, and other reclamation requirements, and for soil erosion control, water quality and watershed control, waste disposal, and flood control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 800, Sec. 3.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2757.

The state policy adopted by the board shall be based upon a study of the factors that significantly affect the present and future condition of mined lands, and shall be used as standards by lead agencies in preparing specific and general plans, including the conservation and land use elements of the general plan and zoning ordinances. The state policy shall not include aspects of regulating surface mining operations which are solely of local concern, and not of statewide or regional concern, as determined by the board, such as, but not limited to, hours of operation, noise, dust, fencing, and purely aesthetic considerations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 800, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2758.

Such policy shall include objectives and criteria for all of the following:

(a) Determining the lead agency pursuant to the provisions of Section 2771.

(b) The orderly evaluation of reclamation plans.

(c) Determining the circumstances, if any, under which the approval of a proposed surface mining operation by a lead agency need not be conditioned on a guarantee assuring reclamation of the mined lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2759.

The state policy shall be continuously reviewed and may be revised. During the formulation or revision of the policy, the board shall consult with, and carefully evaluate the recommendations of, the supervisor, any district technical advisory committees, concerned federal, state, and local agencies, educational institutions, civic and public interest organizations, and private organizations and individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 33.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2760.
